Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.7532

DNA identification system—DNA database account.

The state DNA database account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for operation and maintenance of the DNA database and all receipts under RCW 43.43.7541. Expenditures from the account may be used only for creation, operation, and maintenance of the DNA database under RCW 43.43.754. Only the chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2023 c 449 s 3; 2002 c 289 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 449: See note following RCW 13.40.058.

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 289: See notes following RCW 43.43.753.